Colorado, session 2026A, HB1271.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 83 to title
27 as follows:
ARTICLE 83
Behavioral Health Treatment
and Recovery Enterprises Act
27-83-101. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS ARTICLE 83 IS THE "BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
TREATMENT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISES ACT".
27-83-102. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) ALCOHOL USE CAN CAUSE SERIOUS MEDICAL CONDITIONS OR
DEATH;
(b) THE INTENT OF THIS ARTICLE 83 IS TO ESTABLISH THREE
ENTERPRISES TO COLLECT FEES FROM THE MANUFACTURERS AND
DISTRIBUTORS OF ALCOHOL TO DEFRAY THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS
ASSOCIATED WITH MITIGATING ALCOHOL-RELATED HARMS CAUSED BY THE
PRODUCTS OF ALCOHOL MANUFACTURERS AND DISTRIBUTORS;
(c) CONSISTENT WITH THE DETERMINATION OF THE COLORADO
SUPREME COURT IN NICHOLL V. E-470 PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY, 896
P.2d 859 (COLO. 1995), THE POWER TO IMPOSE TAXES IS INCONSISTENT
WITH ENTERPRISE STATUS PURSUANT TO SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE
-2- HB26-1271

STATE CONSTITUTION, AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY CONCLUDES THAT
THE REVENUE COLLECTED BY THE THREE ENTERPRISES IS A FEE, NOT A
TAX, BECAUSE THE FEES ARE IMPOSED TO DEFRAY THE DIRECT AND
INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH MITIGATING ALCOHOL-RELATED
HARMS CAUSED BY THE PRODUCTS OF ALCOHOL MANUFACTURERS AND
DISTRIBUTORS; AND
(d) MANUFACTURERS AND WHOLESALE DISTRIBUTORS OF ALCOHOL
SHOULD BEAR SOME OF THE INCREASED COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
MITIGATING ALCOHOL-RELATED HARMS CAUSED BY THE PRODUCTS OF
ALCOHOL MANUFACTURERS AND DISTRIBUTORS.
27-83-103. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 83, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ALCOHOL IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISES FEE
COLLECTION FUND" MEANS THE ALCOHOL IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISES FEE COLLECTION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-108.
(2) "ALCOHOL USE DISORDER" MEANS THE RECURRENT USE OF
ALCOHOL THAT CAUSES CLINICALLY AND FUNCTIONALLY SIGNIFICANT
IMPAIRMENT, SUCH AS HEALTH PROBLEMS, DISABILITY, AND FAILURE TO
MEET MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES AT WORK, SCHOOL, OR HOME.
(3) "APPLE WINE" MEANS AN ALCOHOL BEVERAGE THAT IS NOT
CIDER AND THAT CONTAINS AT LEAST ONE-HALF OF ONE PERCENT
ALCOHOL BY VOLUME AND NOT MORE THAN TWENTY-TWO PERCENT
ALCOHOL BY VOLUME THAT CONTAINS THE JUICE OR CONCENTRATED JUICE
OF APPLES OR PEARS.
(4) "BEER" MEANS:
(a) FERMENTED MALT BEVERAGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
-3- HB26-1271

44-4-103; AND
(b) MALT LIQUORS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 44-3-103.
(5) "BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE" MEANS THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-105.
(6) "BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE"
MEANS THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE
CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-105.
(7) "BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND"
MEANS THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-105.
(8) "BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION" OR "BHA" MEANS
THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION IN THE DEPARTMENT OF
HUMAN SERVICES ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-102.
(9) "BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
ORGANIZATION" OR "BHASO" MEANS AN ORGANIZATION SELECTED BY
AND CONTRACTED WITH THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-50-401 TO MANAGE A NETWORK OF PROVIDERS
TO DELIVER A CONTINUUM OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES AND CARE
COORDINATION IN THE ORGANIZATION'S REGION.
(10) "BOARD" MEANS THE ALCOHOL IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE BOARD CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-104.
(11) "CIDER" MEANS HARD CIDER, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
44-3-103.
(12) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(13) "MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTOR"
MEANS ANY PERSON HOLDING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING LICENSES ISSUED
-4- HB26-1271

BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 3 OF TITLE
44:
(a) MANUFACTURER'S LICENSE;
(b) LIMITED WINERY LICENSE;
(c) WHOLESALER'S LIQUOR LICENSE;
(d) WHOLESALER'S BEER LICENSE;
(e) BREW PUB LICENSE;
(f) DISTILLERY PUB LICENSE; OR
(g) VINTNER'S RESTAURANT LICENSE.
(14) "SPIRITS" MEANS SPIRITOUS LIQUORS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
44-3-103.
(15) "SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE" MEANS THE
SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SECTION
27-83-106.
(16) "SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE" MEANS THE SPIRITS
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-106.
(17) "SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND" MEANS THE SPIRITS
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-106.
(18) "WINE" MEANS VINOUS LIQUORS, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
44-3-103; EXCEPT THAT "WINE" DOES NOT INCLUDE HARD CIDER OR APPLE
WINE.
(19) "WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE" MEANS THE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-107.
(20) "WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE" MEANS THE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY FEE CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-107.
(21) "WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND" MEANS THE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND CREATED IN SECTION 27-83-107.
-5- HB26-1271

27-83-104. Board - creation - membership - powers and duties.
(1) THE ALCOHOL IMPACT AND RECOVERY BOARD OF DIRECTORS
GOVERNS THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE.
(2) (a) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS WHO
ARE APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS THE BEER, CIDER, OR APPLE
WINE INDUSTRY;
(II) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS THE SPIRITS INDUSTRY;
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS THE WINE INDUSTRY;
(IV) THREE MEMBERS WHO ARE LICENSED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
PROFESSIONALS WHO HAVE EXPERTISE IN ALCOHOL USE DISORDER
TREATMENT;
(V) TWO MEMBERS WHO ARE IN RECOVERY FOR AN ALCOHOL USE
DISORDER;
(VI) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A PUBLIC HEALTH PROFESSIONAL;
(VII) ONE MEMBER WHO IS AN EXPERT IN YOUTH AND FAMILY
ALCOHOL USE PREVENTION; AND
(VIII) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A FINANCE OR ECONOMICS
PROFESSIONAL.
(b) (I) EACH BOARD MEMBER TERM IS FOUR YEARS.
(II) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
APPOINT THE BOARD MEMBERS.
(c) IF A VACANCY OF A BOARD MEMBER OCCURS, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL PROMPTLY APPOINT A NEW MEMBER TO COMPLETE THE TERM. THE
NEW MEMBER MUST SATISFY THE SAME QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENT
-6- HB26-1271

DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION AS THE BOARD MEMBER
WHO VACATED THEIR SEAT.
(d) BOARD MEMBERS SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION BUT MAY BE
REIMBURSED FOR ACTUAL AND NECESSARY EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 83.
(3) THE BOARD SHALL, AT A MINIMUM:
(a) REVIEW CURRENT STATE PLANS RELATED TO ALCOHOL USE
DISORDER AND FETAL ALCOHOL SPECTRUM DISORDERS PREVENTION,
EARLY INTERVENTION, TREATMENT, RECOVERY, AND HARM REDUCTION
SUPPORT SERVICES IN ORDER TO FORMULATE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
USES OF MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FUND, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND, AND THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND;
(b) REVIEW AND APPROVE AN ANNUAL BUDGET FOR THE BEER,
CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE;
(c) REVIEW AND APPROVE RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ALLOCATION
OF MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
FUND, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND, AND THE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY FUND;
(d) REVIEW THE OUTCOMES ACHIEVED WITH THE ALLOCATIONS;
AND
(e) COMPLY WITH REPORTING AND AUDITING REQUIREMENTS
PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-83-109.
(4) IN ADDITION TO POWERS AND DUTIES SPECIFIED IN THIS
ARTICLE 83, THE BOARD IS AUTHORIZED TO:
-7- HB26-1271

(a) ADOPT BYLAWS FOR THE REGULATION OF ITS AFFAIRS AND
CONDUCT OF ITS BUSINESS AND THE BUSINESS OF THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE;
(b) ACQUIRE, HOLD TITLE TO, AND DISPOSE OF REAL AND
PERSONAL PROPERTY;
(c) AUTHORIZE AND ISSUE REVENUE BONDS THAT ARE PAYABLE
FROM MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FUND, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND, AND THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND;
(d) EMPLOY AND SUPERVISE INDIVIDUALS AS ARE NECESSARY IN
ITS JUDGMENT;
(e) CONTRACT WITH ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ENTITY, INCLUDING
STATE AGENCIES, CONSULTANTS, AND THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S OFFICE,
FOR PROFESSIONAL AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, OFFICE SPACE AND
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES, ADVICE, AND OTHER SERVICES RELATED TO
THE CONDUCT OF THE AFFAIRS OF THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE; AND
(f) TO ADOPT, AMEND, OR REPEAL POLICIES FOR THE REGULATION
OF THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE'S AFFAIRS, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE'S
AFFAIRS, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE'S AFFAIRS.
(5) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL PAY A FAIR MARKET
-8- HB26-1271

RATE TO ANY PUBLIC ENTITY, PRIVATE ENTITY, CONTRACTOR, OR
CONSULTANT, WHICH MAY INCLUDE A STATE AGENCY, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL'S OFFICE, OR THE DEPARTMENT, THAT IS HIRED BY THE
ENTERPRISE TO PERFORM DUTIES.
(6) IF A BOARD MEMBER HAS A CONFLICT OF INTEREST WITH
RESPECT TO ANY MATTER SCHEDULED FOR HEARING BEFORE THE BOARD,
THE BOARD MEMBER SHALL RECUSE THEMSELF FROM ANY DISCUSSION AND
DECISION ON THE MATTER UNLESS, AFTER FULL DISCLOSURE OF THE FACTS
GIVING RISE TO THE CONFLICT, ALL BOARD MEMBERS AGREE TO WAIVE THE
CONFLICT.
27-83-105. Beer, cider, and apple wine impact and recovery
enterprise - creation - powers and duties - fund - fees - loan - repeal.
(1) (a) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE IS CREATED IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION.
THE PRIMARY BUSINESS PURPOSE OF THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS TO DEFRAY THE DIRECT AND
INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH MITIGATING HARMS CAUSED BY BEER,
CIDER, AND APPLE WINE MANUFACTURED OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE.
TO ALLOW THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE TO ACCOMPLISH THIS BUSINESS PURPOSE, THE BEER, CIDER,
AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL PROVIDE:
(I) BUSINESS-RELATED SERVICES FOR ALCOHOL USE DISORDER AND
FETAL ALCOHOL SPECTRUM DISORDERS; AND
(II) A SUSTAINABLE SOURCE OF MONEY TO PAY FOR THE SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE IS AND OPERATES AS A GOVERNMENT-OWNED BUSINESS
-9- HB26-1271

WITHIN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(I) CHARGING, COLLECTING, AND EXPENDING MONEY FROM THE
BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE; AND
(II) UTILIZING THE MONEY COLLECTED FROM THE BEER, CIDER,
AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE TO EQUITABLY DISTRIBUTE
THE MONEY TO SUPPORT THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I)
OF THIS SECTION IN COMMUNITIES THROUGHOUT THE STATE BASED ON THE
IDENTIFIED NEEDS OF EACH COMMUNITY, INCLUDING:
(A) PUBLIC AWARENESS AND PREVENTION CAMPAIGNS
CONDUCTED BY, AND IN PARTNERSHIP WITH, MANUFACTURER OR
WHOLESALE ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTORS;
(B) PROGRAMS THAT PREVENT AND DETER DRIVING UNDER THE
INFLUENCE, DRIVING WHILE ABILITY IMPAIRED, AND DRUNK DRIVING; AND
(C) PREVENTION, EARLY INTERVENTION, AND COMMUNITY
OUTREACH PROGRAMS AND SERVICES CONDUCTED BY PROVIDERS IN THE
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION'S PROVIDER NETWORK, AS
ADMINISTERED BY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
ORGANIZATIONS, WITH PRIORITIZATION FOR PROGRAMS AND SERVICES
THAT SERVE VETERANS.
(c) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE IS GOVERNED BY THE BOARD.
(2) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20
OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION WHILE IT RETAINS THE
AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS AND RECEIVES LESS THAN TEN
PERCENT OF ITS TOTAL REVENUE IN GRANTS FROM ALL COLORADO STATE
AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS COMBINED. AS LONG AS THE BEER, CIDER, AND
-10- HB26-1271

APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES AN
ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2), IT IS NOT SUBJECT TO ANY
PROVISIONS OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(3) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE IS A TYPE 2 ENTITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-1-105 AND
EXERCISES ITS POWERS AND PERFORMS ITS DUTIES UNDER THE
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION.
(4) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE'S PRIMARY POWERS AND DUTIES ARE:
(a) TO CHARGE THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE; AND
(b) TO EXPEND BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE REVENUE, MATCHING FEDERAL MONEY, AND ANY OTHER
MONEY FROM THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
FUND.
(5) (a) THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE BEER, CIDER,
AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND CONSISTS OF
MONEY CREDITED TO THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND AND ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS
RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND MUST NOT BE DEPOSITED INTO OR
TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND OR ANY OTHER FUND. THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE
DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND TO THE BEER, CIDER, AND
-11- HB26-1271

APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND. ANY
UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND REMAINS IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND AND MUST NOT BE
CREDITED OR TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND OR ANY OTHER FUND.
(c) MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FOR
THE PURPOSES OF:
(I) PAYING FOR ANY DIRECT AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, NOT TO EXCEED FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF
MONEY IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FUND; AND
(II) CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
(d) THE BOARD MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF
THIS SECTION, AS LONG AS THE COMBINATION OF GRANTS FROM STATE AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IS LESS THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE BEER, CIDER,
AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE'S TOTAL REVENUE.
ANY MONEY RECEIVED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(d) MUST BE
TRANSMITTED TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY
TO THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
FUND.
(6) (a) FOR THE STATE FISCAL YEAR COMMENCING JULY 1, 2027,
AND FOR EACH STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, UNLESS ADJUSTED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(b) OF THIS SECTION, THE BEER, CIDER, AND
-12- HB26-1271

APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS AUTHORIZED TO
CHARGE A BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE
THAT IS REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE COSTS OF THE SERVICES
PROVIDED BY THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FROM EVERY MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL
DISTRIBUTOR OF $0.05 ON EVERY GALLON OF BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE
WINE DISTRIBUTED IN COLORADO.
(b) IF THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FINDS THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE NEEDS TO BE INCREASED OR DECREASED SO THAT THE FEE
IS REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE COSTS OF THE SERVICES
PROVIDED BY THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE, THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE SHALL RECOMMEND THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE INCREASE OR DECREASE TO THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE FINANCE
COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, NO LATER THAN
DECEMBER 15 PRIOR TO THE STATE FISCAL YEAR DURING WHICH THE
ADJUSTMENT WILL BECOME EFFECTIVE. THE RECOMMENDATION MUST
INCLUDE PROPOSED INFLATIONARY CHANGES, ANY CHANGES BASED ON
THE COSTS OF THE BUSINESS SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND ANY OTHER
INFORMATION DEEMED RELEVANT BY THE BOARD. THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL NOT ADJUST THE
FEE UNLESS APPROVED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ACTING BY BILL, AND
THE FEE MUST NOT BE GREATER THAN $0.05 ON EVERY GALLON OF BEER,
CIDER, AND APPLE WINE DISTRIBUTED IN COLORADO.
-13- HB26-1271

(c) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED BY THIS SUBSECTION (6) AS
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-83-108.
(7) (a) ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, OR AS SOON AS POSSIBLE
THEREAFTER, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER SIX HUNDRED FIFTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND FOR THE PURPOSE OF
DEFRAYING EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE BEFORE IT RECEIVES REVENUE FROM
THE FEE OR REVENUE BOND PROCEEDS. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER
LAW, THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE MAY ACCEPT AND EXPEND ANY MONEY TRANSFERRED, AND,
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY STATE FISCAL RULE OR GENERALLY ACCEPTED
ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLE THAT COULD OTHERWISE BE INTERPRETED TO
REQUIRE A CONTRARY CONCLUSION, THE TRANSFER IS A LOAN FROM THE
STATE TREASURER TO THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE REPAID AND IS NOT A
GRANT FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 (2)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION OR AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102. LOAN LIABILITIES
THAT ARE RECORDED IN THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FUND BUT ARE NOT REQUIRED TO BE PAID IN THE CURRENT
STATE FISCAL YEAR MUST NOT BE CONSIDERED WHEN CALCULATING
SUFFICIENT STATUTORY FUND BALANCE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION
24-75-109.
(b) NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2029, THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL REPAY THE LOAN OF SIX
-14- HB26-1271

HUNDRED FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(7)(a) OF THIS SECTION AND ACCUMULATED INTEREST FROM THE BEER,
CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND. INTEREST ACCRUES
ON THE MONEY BORROWED AT A RATE EQUIVALENT TO THE RATE PER
ANNUM ON THE MOST RECENTLY ISSUED TEN-YEAR UNITED STATES
TREASURY NOTE, ROUNDED TO THE NEAREST ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT,
AS REPORTED BY THE "WALL STREET JOURNAL", AS OF THE DATE THE
TRANSFER REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS MADE.
INTEREST ACCRUES AT THE RATE SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7)(b)
BEGINNING ON THAT DATE AND UNTIL THE DATE ON WHICH THE MONEY IS
REPAID.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2031.
27-83-106. Spirits impact and recovery enterprise - creation
- powers and duties - fund - fees - loan - repeal.
(1) (a) THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS
CREATED IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION. THE PRIMARY
BUSINESS PURPOSE OF THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS
TO DEFRAY THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
MITIGATING HARMS CAUSED BY SPIRITS MANUFACTURED OR DISTRIBUTED
IN THE STATE. TO ALLOW THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
TO ACCOMPLISH THIS BUSINESS PURPOSE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL PROVIDE:
(I) BUSINESS-RELATED SERVICES FOR ALCOHOL USE DISORDER AND
FETAL ALCOHOL SPECTRUM DISORDERS; AND
(II) A SUSTAINABLE SOURCE OF MONEY TO PAY FOR THE SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS AND
-15- HB26-1271

OPERATES AS A GOVERNMENT-OWNED BUSINESS WITHIN THE BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ADMINISTRATION FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(I) CHARGING, COLLECTING, AND EXPENDING MONEY FROM THE
SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE; AND
(II) UTILIZING THE MONEY COLLECTED FROM THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY FEE TO EQUITABLY DISTRIBUTE THE MONEY TO SUPPORT
THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION IN
COMMUNITIES THROUGHOUT THE STATE BASED ON THE IDENTIFIED NEEDS
OF EACH COMMUNITY, INCLUDING:
(A) GUIDANCE AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES TO
MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTERS; AND
(B) HIGH-INTENSITY TREATMENT, INPATIENT CAPACITY, AND
CRISIS STABILIZATION PROGRAMS AND SERVICES CONDUCTED BY
PROVIDERS IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION'S PROVIDER
NETWORK, AS ADMINISTERED BY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS, WITH PRIORITIZATION FOR PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES THAT SERVE VETERANS; AND
(c) THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS GOVERNED
BY THE BOARD.
(2) THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES
AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION WHILE IT RETAINS THE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE
BONDS AND RECEIVES LESS THAN TEN PERCENT OF ITS TOTAL REVENUE IN
GRANTS FROM ALL COLORADO STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS
COMBINED. AS LONG AS THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2), IT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO ANY PROVISIONS OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE
-16- HB26-1271

STATE CONSTITUTION.
(3) THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS A TYPE 2
ENTITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-1-105 AND EXERCISES ITS POWERS AND
PERFORMS ITS DUTIES UNDER THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION.
(4) THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE'S PRIMARY
POWERS AND DUTIES ARE:
(a) TO CHARGE AND COLLECT THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY
FEE; AND
(b) TO EXPEND SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE REVENUE,
MATCHING FEDERAL MONEY, AND ANY OTHER MONEY FROM THE SPIRITS
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND.
(5) (a) THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND IS
CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY CREDITED TO THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND AND ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, OR
DONATIONS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE MONEY IN THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
FUND MUST NOT BE DEPOSITED INTO OR TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL
FUND OR ANY OTHER FUND. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL
INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF
MONEY IN THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND TO THE
SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND. ANY UNENCUMBERED
MONEY IN THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND REMAINS
IN THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND AND MUST NOT
BE CREDITED OR TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND OR ANY OTHER
FUND.
(c) MONEY IN THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
-17- HB26-1271

FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(I) PAYING FOR ANY DIRECT AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE,
NOT TO EXCEED FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY IN THE SPIRITS
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND; AND
(II) CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
(d) THE BOARD MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF
THIS SECTION, AS LONG AS THE COMBINATION OF GRANTS FROM STATE AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IS LESS THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE'S TOTAL REVENUE. ANY MONEY RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(d) MUST BE TRANSMITTED TO THE
STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND.
(6) (a) FOR THE STATE FISCAL YEAR COMMENCING JULY 1, 2027,
AND FOR EACH STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, UNLESS ADJUSTED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(b) OF THIS SECTION, THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS AUTHORIZED TO CHARGE A SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY FEE THAT IS REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE
COSTS OF THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FROM EVERY MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL
DISTRIBUTOR OF $0.35 ON EVERY LITER OF SPIRITS DISTRIBUTED IN
COLORADO.
(b) IF THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FINDS THE
SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE NEEDS TO BE INCREASED OR
DECREASED SO THAT THE FEE IS REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE
-18- HB26-1271

COSTS OF THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL
RECOMMEND THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE INCREASE OR
DECREASE TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES FINANCE COMMITTEE AND
THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, NO
LATER THAN DECEMBER 15 PRIOR TO THE STATE FISCAL YEAR DURING
WHICH THE ADJUSTMENT WILL BECOME EFFECTIVE. THE
RECOMMENDATION MUST INCLUDE PROPOSED INFLATIONARY CHANGES,
ANY CHANGES BASED ON THE COSTS OF THE BUSINESS SERVICES PROVIDED
BY THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND ANY OTHER
INFORMATION DEEMED RELEVANT BY THE BOARD. THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL NOT ADJUST THE FEE UNLESS
APPROVED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ACTING BY BILL, AND THE FEE
MUST NOT BE GREATER THAN $0.35 ON EVERY LITER OF SPIRITS
DISTRIBUTED IN COLORADO.
(c) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY
FEE IMPOSED BY THIS SUBSECTION (6) AS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION
27-83-108.
(7) (a) ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, OR AS SOON AS POSSIBLE
THEREAFTER, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER SIX HUNDRED FIFTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY FUND FOR THE PURPOSE OF DEFRAYING EXPENSES
INCURRED BY THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE BEFORE IT
RECEIVES REVENUE FROM THE FEE OR REVENUE BOND PROCEEDS.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE MAY ACCEPT AND EXPEND ANY MONEY TRANSFERRED, AND,
-19- HB26-1271

NOTWITHSTANDING ANY STATE FISCAL RULE OR GENERALLY ACCEPTED
ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLE THAT COULD OTHERWISE BE INTERPRETED TO
REQUIRE A CONTRARY CONCLUSION, THE TRANSFER IS A LOAN FROM THE
STATE TREASURER TO THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE REPAID AND IS NOT A GRANT FOR PURPOSES OF
SECTION 20 (2)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102. LOAN LIABILITIES THAT ARE RECORDED
IN THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND BUT ARE NOT REQUIRED TO
BE PAID IN THE CURRENT STATE FISCAL YEAR MUST NOT BE CONSIDERED
WHEN CALCULATING SUFFICIENT STATUTORY FUND BALANCE FOR
PURPOSES OF SECTION 24-75-109.
(b) NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2029, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL REPAY THE LOAN OF SIX HUNDRED FIFTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS
SECTION AND ACCUMULATED INTEREST FROM THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FUND. INTEREST ACCRUES ON THE MONEY BORROWED AT A
RATE EQUIVALENT TO THE RATE PER ANNUM ON THE MOST RECENTLY
ISSUED TEN-YEAR UNITED STATES TREASURY NOTE, ROUNDED TO THE
NEAREST ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT, AS REPORTED BY THE "WALL
STREET JOURNAL", AS OF THE DATE THE TRANSFER REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS MADE. INTEREST ACCRUES AT THE
RATE SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7)(b) BEGINNING ON THAT DATE AND
UNTIL THE DATE ON WHICH THE MONEY IS REPAID.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2031.
27-83-107. Wine impact and recovery enterprise - creation -
powers and duties - fund - fees - loan - repeal.
(1) (a) THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS CREATED
-20- HB26-1271

IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION. THE PRIMARY BUSINESS
PURPOSE OF THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS DEFRAY THE
DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH MITIGATING HARMS
CAUSED BY WINE MANUFACTURED OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE. TO
ALLOW THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE TO ACCOMPLISH
THIS BUSINESS PURPOSE, THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
SHALL PROVIDE:
(I) BUSINESS-RELATED SERVICES FOR ALCOHOL USE DISORDER AND
FETAL ALCOHOL SPECTRUM DISORDER; AND
(II) A SUSTAINABLE SOURCE OF MONEY TO PAY FOR THE SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS AND
OPERATES AS A GOVERNMENT-OWNED BUSINESS WITHIN THE BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ADMINISTRATION FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(I) CHARGING, COLLECTING, AND EXPENDING MONEY FROM THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE; AND
(II) UTILIZING THE MONEY COLLECTED FROM THE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY FEE TO EQUITABLY DISTRIBUTE THE MONEY TO SUPPORT
THE SERVICES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION IN
COMMUNITIES THROUGHOUT THE STATE BASED ON THE IDENTIFIED NEEDS
OF EACH COMMUNITY, INCLUDING:
(A) PROVIDING ALCOHOL IMPACT DATA COLLECTION, ANALYSIS,
AND REPORTING BACK TO THE MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL
DISTRIBUTORS; AND
(B) ACCESS TO INTEGRATED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AND RECOVERY
SERVICES AND PROGRAMS ACROSS THE CONTINUUM OF CARE, INCLUDING
FAMILY-BASED AND COMMUNITY-CENTERED TREATMENT OPTIONS,
-21- HB26-1271

FACILITATED BY PROVIDERS IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION'S PROVIDER NETWORK, AS ADMINISTERED BY
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS, WITH
PRIORITIZATION FOR PROGRAMS AND SERVICES THAT SERVE VETERANS;
AND
(c) THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS GOVERNED BY
THE BOARD.
(2) THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES
AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION WHILE IT RETAINS THE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE
BONDS AND RECEIVES LESS THAN TEN PERCENT OF ITS TOTAL REVENUE IN
GRANTS FROM ALL COLORADO STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS
COMBINED. AS LONG AS THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2), IT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO ANY PROVISIONS OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION.
(3) THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS A TYPE 2
ENTITY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-1-105 AND EXERCISES ITS POWERS AND
PERFORMS ITS DUTIES UNDER THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION.
(4) THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE'S PRIMARY
POWERS AND DUTIES ARE:
(a) TO CHARGE AND COLLECT THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
FEE; AND
(b) TO EXPEND WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE REVENUE,
MATCHING FEDERAL MONEY, AND ANY OTHER MONEY FROM THE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND.
(5) (a) THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND IS
-22- HB26-1271

CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FUND CONSISTS OF MONEY CREDITED TO THE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND AND ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, OR
DONATIONS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE MONEY IN THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE
FUND MUST NOT BE DEPOSITED INTO OR TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL
FUND OR ANY OTHER FUND. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL
INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF
MONEY IN THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND TO THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND. ANY UNENCUMBERED
MONEY IN THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND REMAINS
IN THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND AND MUST NOT BE
CREDITED OR TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND OR ANY OTHER FUND.
(c) MONEY IN THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND
IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED TO THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(I) PAYING FOR ANY DIRECT AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE,
NOT TO EXCEED FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT OF MONEY IN THE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND; AND
(II) CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
(d) THE BOARD MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF
THIS SECTION, AS LONG AS THE COMBINATION OF GRANTS FROM STATE AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IS LESS THAN TEN PERCENT OF THE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE'S TOTAL REVENUE. ANY MONEY RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)(d) MUST BE TRANSMITTED TO THE
-23- HB26-1271

STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FUND.
(6) (a) FOR THE STATE FISCAL YEAR COMMENCING JULY 1, 2027,
AND FOR EACH STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, UNLESS ADJUSTED
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6)(b) OF THIS SECTION, THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE IS AUTHORIZED TO CHARGE A WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE THAT IS REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE COSTS
OF THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE FROM EVERY MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL
DISTRIBUTOR OF $0.07 ON EVERY LITER OF WINE DISTRIBUTED IN
COLORADO.
(b) IF THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE FINDS THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE NEEDS TO BE INCREASED OR DECREASED
SO THAT THE FEE IS REASONABLY CALCULATED BASED ON THE COSTS OF
THE SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE, THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL
RECOMMEND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE INCREASE OR
DECREASE TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES FINANCE COMMITTEE AND
THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, NO
LATER THAN DECEMBER 15 PRIOR TO THE STATE FISCAL YEAR DURING
WHICH THE ADJUSTMENT WILL BECOME EFFECTIVE. THE
RECOMMENDATION MUST INCLUDE PROPOSED INFLATIONARY CHANGES,
ANY CHANGES BASED ON THE COSTS OF THE BUSINESS SERVICES PROVIDED
BY THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND ANY OTHER
INFORMATION DEEMED RELEVANT BY THE BOARD. THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL NOT ADJUST THE FEE UNLESS APPROVED BY
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ACTING BY BILL, AND THE FEE MUST NOT BE
-24- HB26-1271

GREATER THAN $0.07 ON EVERY LITER OF SPIRITS DISTRIBUTED IN
COLORADO.
(c) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
FEE IMPOSED BY THIS SUBSECTION (6) AS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION
27-83-108.
(7) (a) ON SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, OR AS SOON AS POSSIBLE
THEREAFTER, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER SIX HUNDRED FIFTY
THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FUND FOR THE PURPOSE OF DEFRAYING EXPENSES INCURRED BY
THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE BEFORE IT RECEIVES
REVENUE FROM THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE OR REVENUE BOND
PROCEEDS. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE MAY ACCEPT AND EXPEND ANY MONEY
TRANSFERRED, AND, NOTWITHSTANDING ANY STATE FISCAL RULE OR
GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLE THAT COULD OTHERWISE
BE INTERPRETED TO REQUIRE A CONTRARY CONCLUSION, THE TRANSFER
IS A LOAN FROM THE STATE TREASURER TO THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE THAT IS REQUIRED TO BE REPAID AND IS NOT A
GRANT FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 (2)(d) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION OR AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102. LOAN LIABILITIES
THAT ARE RECORDED IN THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND BUT ARE
NOT REQUIRED TO BE PAID IN THE CURRENT STATE FISCAL YEAR MUST NOT
BE CONSIDERED WHEN CALCULATING SUFFICIENT STATUTORY FUND
BALANCE FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 24-75-109.
(b) NO LATER THAN JULY 1, 2029, THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE SHALL REPAY THE LOAN OF SIX HUNDRED FIFTY
-25- HB26-1271

THOUSAND DOLLARS RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS
SECTION AND ACCUMULATED INTEREST FROM THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FUND. INTEREST ACCRUES ON THE MONEY BORROWED AT A
RATE EQUIVALENT TO THE RATE PER ANNUM ON THE MOST RECENTLY
ISSUED TEN-YEAR UNITED STATES TREASURY NOTE, ROUNDED TO THE
NEAREST ONE-TENTH OF ONE PERCENT, AS REPORTED BY THE "WALL
STREET JOURNAL", AS OF THE DATE THE TRANSFER REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION IS MADE. INTEREST ACCRUES AT THE
RATE SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7)(b) BEGINNING ON THAT DATE AND
UNTIL THE DATE ON WHICH THE MONEY IS REPAID.
(c) THIS SUBSECTION (7) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2031.
27-83-108. Fees collection - department of revenue - rules -
fund.
(1) (a) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-83-105,
THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO SECTION
27-83-106, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED PURSUANT
TO SECTION 27-83-107 IN THE SAME MANNER AS THE COLLECTION,
ADMINISTRATION, AND ENFORCEMENT OF STATE ALCOHOL EXCISE TAXES
IMPOSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-503. A MANUFACTURER OR
WHOLESALE ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTOR THAT PAYS THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED BY SECTION 27-83-105,
THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED BY SECTION 27-83-106,
OR THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED BY SECTION 27-83-107
SHALL REMIT THE FEE TO THE DEPARTMENT AT THE SAME TIME AND IN THE
SAME MANNER IN WHICH THE MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL
-26- HB26-1271

DISTRIBUTOR REMITS THE STATE ALCOHOL EXCISE TAXES COLLECTED BY
THE MANUFACTURER OR WHOLESALE ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTOR AS REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-503. THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT RULES TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(b) (I) THE ALCOHOL IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISES FEE
COLLECTION FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE ALCOHOL
IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISES FEE COLLECTION FUND CONSISTS OF
MONEY CREDITED TO THE ALCOHOL IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISES
FEE COLLECTION FUND PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
(II) WHEN COLLECTING THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT
AND RECOVERY FEE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE, AND THE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL RETAIN AN
AMOUNT THAT DOES NOT EXCEED THE TOTAL COST OF COLLECTING,
ADMINISTERING, AND ENFORCING THE FEE AND SHALL TRANSMIT THE
AMOUNT RETAINED TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT IT TO
THE ALCOHOL IMPACT ENTERPRISES FEE COLLECTION FUND.
(III) ALL MONEY IN THE ALCOHOL IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISES FEE COLLECTION FUND IS ANNUALLY APPROPRIATED TO THE
DEPARTMENT TO DEFRAY THE COSTS INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
COLLECTING, ENFORCING, AND ADMINISTERING THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT ALL THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE REVENUE, LESS
ANY AMOUNT RETAINED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT THE NET
-27- HB26-1271

REVENUE TO THE APPROPRIATE, CORRESPONDING BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND, SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND,
OR WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FUND.
(2) (a) EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027, EACH MANUFACTURER OR
WHOLESALE ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTOR SHALL PAY THE BEER, CIDER, AND
APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE FOR ALCOHOL
DISTRIBUTED IN COLORADO.
(b) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE
JANUARY 15 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, EACH MANUFACTURER OR
WHOLESALE ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTER SHALL REPORT TO THE BEER, CIDER,
AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT
AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE THE AMOUNT OF ALCOHOL DISTRIBUTED IN COLORADO
DURING THE PRECEDING STATE FISCAL YEAR, IN A FORM AND MANNER
DETERMINED BY EACH ENTERPRISE.
27-83-109. Reporting and auditing.
(1) (a) ON OR BEFORE FEBRUARY 1, 2029, AND ON OR BEFORE
FEBRUARY 1 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A
WRITTEN REPORT TO THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF
THE SENATE AND THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, OR ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES. AT A
MINIMUM, THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE OUTCOMES OF THE SERVICES SUPPORTED
BY THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE, THE
SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE; AND
-28- HB26-1271

(II) THE INFORMATION REPORTED TO THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE
WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY
ENTERPRISE DESCRIBED IN SECTION 27-83-108 (2).
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT IN SECTION 24-1-136
(11)(a)(I), THE REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED IN THIS
(1) CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
(2) DURING THE 2032-33 STATE FISCAL YEAR, AND DURING EVERY
FOURTH STATE FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL
CONDUCT AN AUDIT OF THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE,
AND THE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE. EACH ENTERPRISE
SHALL PAY THE COSTS OF THE AUDITS OF ITS ENTERPRISE. THE STATE
AUDITOR SHALL REPORT THE FINDINGS FROM THE AUDITS, ALONG WITH
ANY COMMENTS AND RECOMMENDATIONS, TO THE JOINT AUDIT
COMMITTEE AND TO THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF
THE SENATE AND THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, OR ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES. THE
STATE AUDITOR HAS CONTINUING AUTHORITY TO CONDUCT AUDITS OF THE
BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, THE
SPIRITS IMPACT AND RECOVERY ENTERPRISE, AND THE WINE IMPACT AND
RECOVERY ENTERPRISE AS THE STATE AUDITOR DEEMS APPROPRIATE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 44-3-503.5 as
follows:
44-3-503.5. Impact and recovery fees collection.
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND
ENFORCE THE BEER, CIDER, AND APPLE WINE IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE
-29- HB26-1271

IMPOSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-83-105, THE SPIRITS IMPACT AND
RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-83-106, AND THE WINE
IMPACT AND RECOVERY FEE IMPOSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-83-107,
AS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 27-83-108.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-30- HB26-1271